ro-RO: Forma pernei: Cilindrică; Lombară; Cilindrică pentru gât; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Pătrată; Altele
de: Kissenform: Nackenrolle; Lendenwirbelsäule; Nackenrolle; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadrat; Sonstiges
en: Pillow shape: Bolster; Lumbar; Neck roll; Rectangular; Round; Square; Other
zh-CN: 枕头形状: 长枕; 腰椎; 护颈; 矩形; 圆头; 方形; 其他
cs: Tvar polštáře: Podstavec; Bedra; Krční podpora; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Čtvercová; Jiné
nl: Vorm kussen: Krop; Lumbaal; Nekrol; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Andere
ja: ピローの形: ボルスター; 腰部; ネックロール; 長方形; ラウンド; スクエア; その他
hu: Párna alakja: Henger; Derék; Nyaktámasztó; Téglalap; Kerek; Négyzet; Egyéb
nb: Puteform: Bolster; Korsrygg; Nakkerull; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Annen
pl: Kształt poduszki: Płyta matrycowa; Lędźwiowy; Rolka pod szyję; Prostokątna; Runda; Kwadrat; Pozostałe
el: Σχήμα μαξιλαριού: Καραμέλα; Μέσης; Ρολό λαιμού; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
ru: Форма подушки: Валик; Под поясницу; Затылочный валик; Прямоугольник; Круг; Квадрат; Другое
es: Forma de la almohada: Collarín; Lumbares; Rollo de cuello; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otros
fr: Forme d’oreiller: Traversin; Lombaire; Coussin Cylindrique; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Autre
pt-BR: Formato do travesseiro: Travesseiro cilíndrico; Lombar; Proteção para pescoço; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika blazine: Polkrožna; Ledvena podpora; Vzglavnik za vrat; Pravokotno; Okrogla; Kvadratna; Drugo
pt-PT: Formato da almofada: Bolsa; Lombar; Rolo de pescoço; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
sk-SK: Tvar vankúša: Valcový vankúš bolster; Bedrový vankúš; Valcový vankúš pod krk; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Iné
ko: 베개 모양: 받침; 요추; 넥롤; 직사각형; 라운드; 스퀘어; 기타
lt-LT: Pagalvėlės forma: Pailga; Juosmens; Pailga kaklo; Stačiakampė; Apvali; Kvadratinė; Kita
th: รูปร่างของหมอน: หมอนข้าง; ส่วนเอว; หมอนรองคอ; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 枕頭形狀: 抱枕; 腰椎; 圓頸枕; 長方形; 圓頭; 方頭; 其他
it: Forma del cuscino: Scalpello; Lombare; Paranuca; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrato; Altro
da: Pudeform: Bolster; Lænd; Halsrulle; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkant; Andet
vi: Kiểu dáng gối: Gối ôm; Thắt lưng; Gối kê cổ; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
hr-HR: Oblik jastuka: Jastučić za glavu; Lumbalni; Rola za vrat; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Kvadratni; Ostalo
sv: Kuddform: Stoppning; Ländrygg; Nackrulle; Rektangulär; Rund; Fyrkantig; Annat
fi: Tyynyn muoto: tyyny; Lanne; niskatyyny; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на възглавница: Болстър; Лумбална област; Около врата; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Квадратна; Други
tr: Yastık şekli: Destek; Lumbar; Balıkçı yaka; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer